Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska15-209
Railroads, depots, warehouses; power to regulate.

A city of the primary class shall have the power, by ordinance, to regulate levees, depots, depot grounds, and places for storing freight and goods and to provide for and regulate the passing of railways through the streets and public grounds of the city, reserving the rights of all persons injured thereby.

Laws 1901, c. 16, § 129, X, p. 129;

R.S.1913, § 4422;

C.S.1922, § 3806;

C.S.1929, § 15-209;

R.S.1943, § 15-209;

Laws 2020, LB1003, § 28.

Selection and grading of streets by railway company for its track are subject to regulation and control of city. Omaha, L. & B. Ry. Co. v. City of Lincoln, 97 Neb. 122, 149 N.W. 319 (1914).